District of Columbia statutes.
47-132

Payment into Treasury of moneys received from sales of animals and materials.

All moneys received from the sales of animals or materials of any sort, purchased under appropriations made for the District of Columbia since July 1, 1878, other than for the Water Department, shall be paid into the Treasury of the United States, to the credit of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 2, 1889, 25 Stat. 808, ch. 370, § 3
Feb. 22, 1921, 41 Stat. 1144, ch. 70, § 7
June 30, 1944, 58 Stat. 533, ch. 300, § 18
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-132.
1973 Ed., § 47-132.
For updated reference to payment to the General Fund of the District of Columbia, see § 47-129.